Nebraska, session 109, LB164.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB164 LB164
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 7 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Urban Development Incentive Act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that:
(1) Economically distressed areas face significant challenges,
including disinvestment and lack of affordable commercial space;
(2) Small developers and emerging developers are critical to
revitalizing these areas but often lack access to capital, technical
resources, and capacity-building opportunities;
(3) Equitable economic development requires targeted incentives,
public participation, sustainability measures, and streamlined processes
to empower developers and to meet the needs of economically distressed
areas; and
(4) The Urban Development Incentive Act is intended to promote
sustainable, equitable economic growth, local job creation, and holistic
urban redevelopment in Nebraska.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Urban Development Incentive Act:
(1) Affordable commercial space means retail space, office space, or
mixed-use space that is leased at a rate that is at least thirty percent
below the average market rate;
(2) Department means the Department of Economic Development;
(3) Economic redevelopment area means an area in the State of
Nebraska in which:
(a) The average rate of unemployment in the area during the period
covered by the most recent federal decennial census or American Community
Survey 5-Year Estimate by the United States Bureau of the Census is at
least one hundred fifty percent of the average rate of unemployment in
the state during the same period; and
(b) The average poverty rate in the area is twenty percent or more
for the federal census tract in the area;
(4) Economically distressed area means any qualified census tract or
economic redevelopment area;
-2-

LB164 LB164
2025 2025
(5) Eligible developer means a small developer or an emerging
developer;
(6) Emerging developer means a business entity that:
(a) Is engaged in the development of real property;
(b) Has fewer than fifty full-time-equivalent employees;
(c) Had annual gross revenue of no more than five million dollars in
any of the three most recently completed fiscal years;
(d) Is independently owned and operated and is not a subsidiary of a
larger business entity;
(e) Has been in operation for less than ten years;
(f) Has limited access to traditional financing due to barriers such
as size or operational history; and
(g) Has completed fewer than three real estate development projects
exceeding one million dollars;
(7) Green building certification means certified under the
Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design (LEED) rating system or
another comparable rating system as determined by the department;
(8) Mixed-use space means a combination of residential space,
commercial space, and public space within a single property;
(9) Qualified census tract means a qualified census tract as defined
in 26 U.S.C. 42(d)(5)(B)(ii)(I), as such section existed on January 1,
2025; and
(10) Small developer means a business entity that:
(a) Is engaged in the development of real property;
(b) Has fewer than fifty full-time-equivalent employees;
(c) Had annual gross revenue of no more than five million dollars in
any of the three most recently completed fiscal years; and
(d) Is independently owned and operated and is not a subsidiary of a
larger business entity.
Sec. 4. (1) The department shall establish and administer a grant
program to provide funding to eligible developers for real estate
-3-

LB164 LB164
2025 2025
development projects that qualify for funding under subsection (2) of
this section.
(2) A project qualifies for grant funding under this section if the
project involves the development or rehabilitation of affordable
commercial space in an economically distressed area. Any infrastructure
improvements directly related to such development or rehabilitation may
also be included as part of a qualifying project.
(3) Eligible developers may apply for a grant under this section by
submitting an application to the department on a form prescribed by the
department.
(4) The department shall review applications for grants under this
section in the order in which the applications are received.
(5) If a project qualifies for grant funding under this section, the
department may award:
(a) A grant of up to twenty percent of the total project costs,
which may be used to pay any costs related to the project. The total
amount of grants approved each year under this subdivision shall not
exceed twenty million dollars;
(b) A grant of up to ten percent of the total project costs, which
may be used to assist eligible developers in securing private financing
related to the project. The total amount of grants approved each year
under this subdivision shall not exceed ten million dollars;
(c) A grant of up to fifteen percent of any down payment required
for the project, not to exceed two hundred thousand dollars. The total
amount of grants approved each year under this subdivision shall not
exceed five million dollars;
(d) A grant of up to fifty thousand dollars for job creation and
training relating to the project. The total amount of grants approved
each year under this subdivision shall not exceed two million five
hundred thousand dollars;
(e) A grant of up to twenty-five thousand dollars for conducting
-4-

LB164 LB164
2025 2025
public consultations and submitting documentation of community engagement
relating to a project. An additional ten thousand dollars may be awarded
under such grant if over fifty percent of the community feedback is
implemented in the project design. The total amount of grants approved
each year under this subdivision shall not exceed two million dollars;
(f) A grant for sustainability features included as part of a
project. Such grant may include one or more of the following: (i) Up to
fifty thousand dollars if the project involves the installation of
renewable energy systems; (ii) up to seventy-five thousand dollars if the
project achieves green building certification; and (iii) up to thirty
thousand dollars if the project includes community wellness features. The
total amount of grants approved each year under this subdivision (f)
shall not exceed four million dollars; and
(g) A grant for technical assistance and training relating to a
project. Such grant may include one or more of the following: (i) Up to
twenty thousand dollars for hiring consultants, engineers, or financial
planners; (ii) up to five thousand dollars for attending workshops or
certification courses in real estate development or project management;
and (iii) up to fifteen thousand dollars for conducting feasibility
studies or environmental impact assessments. The total amount of grants
approved each year under this subdivision (g) shall not exceed three
million dollars.
(6) The maximum amount of grants awarded under this section for a
single project shall not exceed three million five hundred thousand
dollars.
Sec. 5. The department shall electronically submit an annual report
regarding the Urban Development Incentive Act to the Governor and to the
Legislature. The report shall include:
(1) The total number and amount of grants awarded each year under
the act;
(2) The number and types of projects receiving grant funding each
-5-

LB164 LB164
2025 2025
year under the act; and
(3) The number of jobs created each year as a result of grants
awarded under the act.
Sec. 6. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate forty-
six million five hundred thousand dollars annually from the General Fund
to the department for purposes of carrying out the Urban Development
Incentive Act.
Sec. 7. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the Urban Development Incentive Act.
Sec. 8. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-6-